apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="amig/u__n">
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="man/u__n">
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="traballador/e__n">
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="Etiòpia__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Afganistàn__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Istados_Unidos__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Antoni__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Maria__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Saussure__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="cog"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Linux__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Wikipedia__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Natziones_Unides__np">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->

    <pardef n="me/u__adj" c="p.29">
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="tu/o__adj" c="p.29">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>u</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>o</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prim/u__adj" c="p.44 / 105">
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="ord"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="frantzes/u__adj" c="p.10 / 105">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>o</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>os</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>us</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>u<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="banduler/i__adj" c="p.15 / 105">
      <e>       <p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>is</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>as</l><r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="meda__adj" c="">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>s</l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fàtzil/e__adj" c="p.10 / 105">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- !@LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>is</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- !@LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>es</l><r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="linguìsti/cu__adj">
      <e>       <p><l>cu</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>cos</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>cus</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>ca</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>cas</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gu</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gus</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gos</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gas</l><r>cu<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="matessi__adj" c="">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->

    <pardef n="cando__adv" c="p.31">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guasi__preadv" c="">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bene__adv" c="p.31">
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="altament/e__adv">
      <e>       <p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/no__adv" c="p.31">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>no</l><r>no<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>non</l><r>no<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>no</l><r>no<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->

    <e lm="manu"><i>man</i><par n="man/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="capu"><i>cap</i><par n="amig/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="amigu"><i>amig</i><par n="amig/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mastru"><i>mastr</i><par n="amig/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fìgiu"><i>fìgi</i><par n="amig/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="traballadore"><i>traballador</i><par n="traballador/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Amèrica" r="LR"><p><l>America</l><r>Amèrica</r></p><par n="Etiòpia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Giappone" r="LR"><p><l>Jiaponi</l><r>Giappone</r></p><par n="Etiòpia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mosca"><i>Mosca</i><par n="Etiòpia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tracia"><i>Tracia</i><par n="Etiòpia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Mèssicu" r="LR"><p><l>Mexico</l><r>Mèssicu</r></p><par n="Afganistàn__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Napoli"><i>Napoli</i><par n="Afganistàn__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Istanbul"><i>Istanbul</i><par n="Afganistàn__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pechinu"><i>Pechinu</i><par n="Afganistàn__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Logos Bascios"><i>Logos<b/>Bascios</i><par n="Istados_Unidos__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Logos Bascios" r="LR"><p><l>Paisus<b/>Bascios</l><r>Logos<b/>Bascios</r></p><par n="Istados_Unidos__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Logos Bascios" r="LR"><p><l>Paisos<b/>Bascios</l><r>Logos<b/>Bascios</r></p><par n="Istados_Unidos__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ferdinand"><i>Ferdinand</i><par n="Antoni__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Barney"><i>Barney</i><par n="Antoni__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Raoul"><i>Raoul</i><par n="Antoni__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lucia"><i>Lucia</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Luisa"><i>Luisa</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Inés"><i>Inés</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Marshall"><i>Marshall</i><par n="Saussure__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Willcox"><i>Willcox</i><par n="Saussure__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Marinetti"><i>Marinetti</i><par n="Saussure__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ford"><i>Ford</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Le Monde"><i>Le<b/>Monde</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Natziones Unidas"><i>Natziones<b/>Unidas</i><par n="Natziones_Unides__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Commonwealth of Nations"><i>Commonwealth<b/>of<b/>Nations</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Supercopa"><i>Supercopa</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Generalitat"><i>Generalitat</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Wal-Mart"><i>Wal-Mart</i><par n="Wikipedia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="meu" r="LR"><p><l>mi</l><r>me</r></p><par n="me/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="tuo"><i>tu</i><par n="tu/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="suo"><i>su</i><par n="tu/o__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="nostru"><i>nostr</i><par n="me/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bostru"><i>bostr</i><par n="me/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="segundu" r="LR"><p><l>sigund</l><r>segund</r></p><par n="prim/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="cuartu" r="LR"><p><l>quart</l><r>cuart</r></p><par n="prim/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="penùrtimu"><p><l>penurtim</l><r>penùrtim</r></p><par n="prim/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="matessi" r="LR"><p><l>metessi</l><r>matessi</r></p><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ex"><i>ex</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="che pare"><i>che<b/>pare</i><par n="matessi__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="pùblicu"><i>pùbli</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="patzìficu"><i>patzìfi</i><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="arbanesu"><i>arbanes</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="santu"><i>sant</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="fìsicu" r="LR"><p><l>fisi</l><r>fìsi</r></p><par n="linguìsti/cu__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="islovenu"><i>isloven</i><par n="frantzes/u__adj"/></e>
<e lm="banduleri"><i>banduler</i><par n="banduler/i__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="meda" r="LR"><p><l>mera</l><r>meda</r></p><par n="meda__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="indipendentista"><i>indipendentista</i><par n="meda__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="generalista"><i>generalista</i><par n="meda__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="difìtzile" r="LR"><p><l>difizil</l><r>difìtzil</r></p><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="indipendente"><i>indipendent</i><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mòbile"><i>mòbil</i><par n="fàtzil/e__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="guasi" r="LR"><p><l>quasi</l><r>guasi</r></p><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="gasì"><i>gasì</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="casi"><i>casi</i><par n="guasi__preadv"/></e>
    <e lm="inue"><i>inue</i><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inue" r="LR"><p><l>innui</l><r>inue</r></p><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pro ite"><i>pro<b/>ite</i><par n="cando__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="no"><i></i><par n="/no__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="comente"><i>comente</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="oru·oru"><i>oru·oru</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
<e lm="autonomamente"><i>autonomament</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tecnicamente"><i>tecnicament</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="definitivamente"><i>definitivament</i><par n="altament/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="in mesu"><i>in<b/>mesu</i><par n="bene__adv"/></e>
